Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
SHARES

7-106-101. Authorized shares.

The articles of incorporation shall state the classes of shares and the number of shares of each class that the corporation is authorized to issue. If more than one class of shares is authorized, the articles of incorporation shall state a distinguishing designation for each class, and, before the issuance of shares of any class, the preferences, limitations, and relative rights of that class shall be stated in the articles of incorporation. All shares of a class shall have preferences, limitations, and relative rights identical with those of other shares of the same class except to the extent otherwise permitted by section 7-106-102.

The articles of incorporation shall authorize:

One or more classes of shares that together have unlimited voting rights; and

One or more classes of shares, which may be the same class or classes as those with voting rights, that together are entitled to receive the net assets of the corporation upon dissolution.

The articles of incorporation may authorize one or more classes of shares that:

Have special, conditional, or limited voting rights, or no right to vote; except that no condition, limitation, or prohibition on voting shall eliminate any right to vote provided by section 7-110-104;

Are redeemable or convertible as stated in the articles of incorporation:

At the option of the corporation, the shareholder, or another person or upon the occurrence of a designated event;

For money, indebtedness, securities, or other property; or

In a designated amount or in an amount determined in accordance with a designated formula or by reference to extrinsic facts or events;

Entitle the holders to distributions calculated in any manner, including dividends that may be cumulative, noncumulative, or partially cumulative; or

Have preference over any other class of shares with respect to distributions, including dividends and distributions upon the dissolution of the corporation.

The description of the preferences, limitations, and relative rights of classes of shares in subsection (3) of this section is not exhaustive.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 753, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

IP(3)(b) amended, p. 2316, § 226, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 880, § 70, effective July 1.

7-106-102. Terms of class or series determined by board of directors.

If the articles of incorporation so provide, the board of directors may determine, in whole or in part, the preferences, limitations, and relative rights, within the limits set forth in section 7-106-101, of:

Any class of shares before the issuance of any shares of that class; or

One or more series within a class before the issuance of any shares of that series.

Each series of a class shall be given a distinguishing designation.

All shares of a series shall have preferences, limitations, and relative rights identical with those of other shares of the same series and, except to the extent otherwise provided in the description of the series, with those of other series of the same class.

Before issuing any shares of a class or series, the preferences, limitations, and relative rights of which are determined by the board of directors under this section, the corporation shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of amendment to the articles of incorporation, which are effective without shareholder action, that state:

The domestic entity name of the corporation;

The text of the amendment determining the designations, preferences, limitations, and relative rights of the class or series of shares;

The date the amendment was adopted; and

A statement that the amendment was duly adopted by the board of directors.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 754, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2002:

IP(4) amended, p. 1847, § 108, effective July 1; IP(4) amended, p. 1712, § 108, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(4) and (4)(a) amended, p. 2316, § 227, effective July 1, 2004.

7-106-103. Issued and outstanding shares.

A corporation may issue the number of shares of each class or series authorized by the articles of incorporation. Shares that are issued are outstanding shares until they are reacquired, redeemed, converted, or canceled.

The reacquisition, redemption, or conversion of outstanding shares is subject to the limitations contained in subsection (3) of this section and is subject to section 7-106-401.

At all times that shares of the corporation are outstanding, one or more shares that together have unlimited voting rights and one or more shares that together are entitled to receive the net assets of the corporation upon dissolution shall be outstanding.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 754, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-106-104. Fractional shares.

A corporation may:

Issue fractions of a share or pay in cash the value of fractions of a share;

Arrange for disposition of fractional shares by the shareholders; or

Issue scrip in registered or bearer form entitling the holder to receive a full share upon surrendering enough scrip to equal a full share.

Each certificate representing scrip shall be conspicuously labeled "scrip" and shall contain the information required to be included in a share certificate by sections 7-106-206 (2)(a), (2)(c), and (4) and 7-106-208 (2).

The holder of a fractional share is entitled to exercise the rights of a shareholder, including the right to vote, to receive dividends, and to participate in the assets of the corporation upon liquidation. The holder of scrip is not entitled to any of these rights unless the scrip provides for them.

The board of directors may authorize the issuance of scrip subject to any condition considered desirable, including:

That the scrip will become void if not exchanged for full shares before a stated date; and

That the shares for which the scrip is exchangeable may be sold and the proceeds paid to the scripholders.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 755, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

(4)(a) amended, p. 2316, § 228, effective July 1, 2004.

7-106-105. Reverse split.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, the outstanding shares of a class or series may be reduced to a lesser number of shares by a reverse split made on the terms set forth in this section.

To effect the reverse split, each outstanding share of the class or series shall be divided by the same divisor as is every other such share.

Each share of the class or series shall have, after the reverse split, such par value, if any, as may be stated in the articles of incorporation.

If the articles of incorporation are to be amended in connection with the reverse split, whether to change the number of authorized shares of such class or series or the par value, if any, of the shares of such class or series or for any other reason, such amendment shall be effected pursuant to article 110 of this title.

In lieu of issuing fractional shares upon such reverse split, the corporation may take any of the actions provided for in section 7-106-104.

For the reverse split to be effected:

The board of directors shall recommend the reverse split to the holders of shares of the class or series that is to be reverse split and to each other voting group that is entitled, by reason of any provision in the articles of incorporation, to vote on the reverse split, unless the board of directors determines that, because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders with the submission of the reverse split; and

The holders of shares of the class or series that is to be reverse split, and each other voting group that is entitled, by reason of any provision in the articles of incorporation, to vote on the reverse split, shall approve the reverse split.

The board of directors may condition the effectiveness of the reverse split on any basis.

The corporation shall give notice, in accordance with section 7-107-105, to each shareholder entitled to vote on the reverse split, of the shareholders' meeting at which the reverse split will be voted upon. The notice of the meeting shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the reverse split, and the notice shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or a summary of the reverse split.

Unless articles 101 to 117 of this title, the articles of incorporation, bylaws adopted by the shareholders, or the proposing board of directors require a greater vote, the reverse split shall be approved by the votes required by sections 7-107-206 and 7-107-207 by every voting group entitled to vote on the reverse split.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1314, § 14, effective June 1.